dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="beige__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kl/ype__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>øpen</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpet</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpet</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpne</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øpne</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ypende</l>    <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ypte</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ypte</l>      <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ypt</l>       <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ypt</l>       <r>ype<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kl/ive__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>even</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evet</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evet</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evne</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evne</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivde</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivde</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivd</l>       <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivd</l>       <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivende</l>    <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skr/i__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>eden</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edet</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edet</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edne</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edne</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iende</l>     <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nedfros/sen__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>sen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fl/yge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>øyen</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydde</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydde</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydd</l>       <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydd</l>       <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ygende</l>    <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kn/ipe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>epen</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epet</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epet</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epne</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epne</l>      <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipende</l>    <r>ipe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="us/sel__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>sel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lere</l>      <r>sel<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>sel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leste</l>     <r>sel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lest</l>      <r>sel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sel</l>       <r>sel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>selt</l>      <r>sel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kles/se__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sende</l>     <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>se<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gripe">           <i>gr</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="barfrossen">      <i>barfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dypfrossen">      <i>dypfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="angripe">         <i>angr</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomfrossen">  <i>gjennomfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forgripe">        <i>forgr</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beige">           <i>beige</i><par n="beige__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glideflyge">      <i>glidefl</i><par n="fl/yge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hardfrossen">     <i>hardfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beinflyge">       <i>beinfl</i><par n="fl/yge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beknipe">         <i>bekn</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="berrfrossen">     <i>berrfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="foregripe">       <i>foregr</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fastfrossen">     <i>fastfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="djupfrossen">     <i>djupfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="flyge">           <i>fl</i><par n="fl/yge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="begripe">         <i>begr</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trive">           <i>tr</i><par n="kl/ive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skri">            <i>skr</i><par n="skr/i__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stivfrossen">     <i>stivfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ussel">           <i>us</i><par n="us/sel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilfrossen">      <i>tilfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pågripe">         <i>pågr</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prøveflyge">      <i>prøvefl</i><par n="fl/yge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klive">           <i>kl</i><par n="kl/ive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nedfrossen">      <i>nedfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klesse">          <i>kles</i><par n="kles/se__adj"/></e>
<e lm="knipe">           <i>kn</i><par n="kn/ipe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klype">           <i>kl</i><par n="kl/ype__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kunstfrossen">    <i>kunstfros</i><par n="nedfros/sen__adj"/></e>
